Utah statutes.
17B-1-418.   Annexed area subject to fees, charges, and taxes.
When an annexation under Section 17B-1-414 or 17B-1-415 or a boundary
adjustment under Section 17B-1-417 is complete, the annexed area or the area
affected by the boundary adjustment shall be subject to user fees or charges
imposed by and property, sales, and other taxes levied by or for the benefit
of the local district.
